District of Columbia statutes.
50-1301.54

Certificate of insurance as proof.

Proof of financial responsibility for the future may be furnished by filing with the Mayor the written certificate of any insurance carrier duly authorized to do business in the District of Columbia certifying that there is in effect a motor vehicle liability policy for the benefit of the person required to furnish proof of financial responsibility. Such certificate shall give the effective date of such motor vehicle liability policy, which date shall be the same as the effective date of the certificate, and shall designate by explicit description or by appropriate reference all vehicles covered thereby unless the policy is issued to a person who is not the owner of a motor vehicle.

History

May 25, 1954, 68 Stat. 133, ch. 222, § 54

Section References

This section is referenced in § 50-1301.53.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-454.
1973 Ed., § 40-470.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.